California, session 20252026, AB2218.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 187 is added to the Government Code, to read:187. (a) The Legislature recognizes that the state historically sanctioned over one century of depredations and prejudicial policies against California Native Americans, including removal from ancestral land. The Legislature apologizes on behalf of the citizens of the state to all California Native Americans for the violence, mistreatment, and neglect inflicted upon them.(b) The Legislature declares that the state government shall support California Native Americans to maintain cultural and linguistic traditions, practice ecosystem stewardship, and engage in good faith government-to-government consultations with all California Native American tribes regarding policies that may affect tribal communities.SEC. 2. Section 106.2 is added to the Water Code, to read:106.2. (a) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of the state to recognize and address the inequities regarding access to, and control over, water caused by state-sanctioned acts of termination, removal, and assimilation inflicted upon all California Native American tribes through financial assistance, protection of tribal water beneficial uses, consultation on water projects, plans, and policies, and incorporation of indigenous knowledge to restore and protect ecosystems.(b) (1) The following state agencies shall implement the policy set forth in subdivision (a) when revising, adopting, or establishing policies, regulations, permits, or grant criteria to address identified inequities:(A) The State Water Resources Control Board.(B) Regional water quality control boards.(C) The Natural Resources Agency and all its departments, conservancies, boards, commissions, and councils.(D) The Delta Stewardship Council.(E) The Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation.(2) The state agencies listed in paragraph (1) shall identify and offer financial assistance to California Native American tribes consistent with existing legal and policy requirements for financial assistance programs.(c) (1) If there is a dispute between a California Native American tribe and a state agency described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) over the implementation of the policy set forth in subdivision (a), that matter shall be brought before the Governor’s Office of Tribal Affairs. The office shall, within 30 days of the date that the tribe or the state agency referred the matter to the office, convene a meeting between the tribe and the state agency for mediation. The meeting shall take place before the state agency action is challenged in court. During mediation, the state agency action that is the subject of the mediation shall be stayed.(2) (A) The Governor’s Office of Tribal Affairs shall gather information on the matter for not more than 60 days from the date of the initial meeting between the tribe and the agency. The office shall have not more than 30 days from the date the office concludes gathering information to reach reconciliation. Reconciliation occurs when the state agency and the California Native American tribe are able to reach a mutually agreeable resolution on the matter.(B) At any point during mediation, a tribe may withdraw from the process if the tribe believes that the state agency is not negotiating in good faith.(3) If the state agency and the tribe do not reach reconciliation within 30 days from the date the office concludes gathering information pursuant to paragraph (2), the state agency action shall be stayed for an additional 60 days after the expiration of the 30-day period described in paragraph (2). If the state agency and the tribe do not reach reconciliation at the end of that 60-day period, the Governor’s Office of Tribal Affairs shall issue a letter documenting the exhaustion of administrative remedies.SEC. 3. Section 1051 of the Water Code is amended to read:1051. (a) The board for the purpose of this division may:(1) Investigate all streams, stream systems, portions of stream systems, lakes, or other bodies of water.(2) Take testimony in regard to the rights to water or the use of water thereon or therein.(3) Investigate and ascertain whether or not water heretofore filed upon or any claimed riparian or appropriative right is valid under the laws of this state.(b) (1) (A) In furtherance of an investigation authorized pursuant to this section, the board may issue an information order, as executed by the executive director of the board.(B) In furtherance of an investigation authorized pursuant to this section, upon request, the board shall consult with a California Native American tribe whose ancestral territory includes the water body or water bodies at issue for the claimed riparian or appropriative right.(2) The information order may be issued to a water right holder or claimant to provide the following information related to a diversion and use of water:(A) Information required to be reported pursuant to Part 5.1 (commencing with Section 5100).(B) Information concerning the basis of the water right claimed.(C) Information related to the patent date claimed for the place of use, if the claimed right is a riparian right.(D) Information concerning the notice date of the appropriation and the date of actual delivery of water to beneficial use.(E) Information concerning prior diversions and use, including direct diversions and diversions to storage.(3) (A) The information order may be issued to a diverter or user of water to provide information concerning that diverter’s prior diversion or use, including direct diversions and diversions to storage, or identification of the person or holder claiming the right under which the water was diverted or used.(B) Information obtained under this paragraph from a diverter or user who is not the water right holder or claimant shall not be binding on, or treated as an admission by, the water right holder or claimant.(c) The burden of any order issued under subdivision (b), including costs, shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the requested information and the benefits to be obtained from the board receiving that information. In making a request, the board shall do both of the following:(1) Provide the person to whom the request is directed with a written explanation with regard to the need for the information.(2) Identify the evidence that supports requiring that person to provide the information.(d) A diversion or use of water ascertained to be unauthorized may be enforced as a trespass under Section 1052, following notice and opportunity for hearing as required under Section 1052, Section 1055, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 1831) of Chapter 12 of Part 2.(e) Nothing in this section shall limit any authority held by the board under this code or any other provision of law.